Washington statutes.
RCW 13.06.040

Application by county or counties for state financial aid.

Any county or group of counties may make application to the department of children, youth, and families in the manner and form prescribed by the department for financial aid for the cost of consolidated juvenile services programs. Any such application must include a plan or plans for providing consolidated services to juvenile offenders in accordance with standards of the department.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 718; 1983 c 191 s 4; 1979 c 141 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 165 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.